North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-38 Income Tax
57-38-40.
Claim for credit or refund.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person may file a claim for credit or refund of an overpayment of any tax imposed by this chapter within three years after the due date of the return or within three years after the return was filed, whichever period expires last.

As to any corporation or other person whose principal place for managing or directing a business is outside North Dakota, if the period for assessment remains open under subsection 2 of section 57-38-38, the period of time for filing of a claim for credit or refund will remain open for the same period prescribed in subsection 2 of section 57-38-38.

An individual who filed a return of income as a resident of this state and is assessed tax by another state or territory of the United States or the District of Columbia on that income after the time for filing a claim has expired under this section is entitled to a credit or refund for the amount of tax paid to the other jurisdiction, not including penalty or interest, as provided under subsection 1 or 4 of section 57-38-30.3, notwithstanding the time limitations of this section. The claim for the credit or refund under this subdivision must be submitted to the commissioner within one year from the date the taxes were paid to the other jurisdiction. The taxpayer must submit sufficient proof to show entitlement to a credit or refund under this subdivision.

If there is a change in taxable income or income tax liability by an amount which is in excess of twenty-five percent of the amount of taxable income or income tax liability stated in the return as filed, a person may file a claim for credit or refund of any tax imposed by this chapter within six years after the due date of the return or within six years after the return was filed, whichever period expires last. The provisions of this subsection do not create or increase any net operating loss otherwise recognized under this chapter for purposes of carryover to any subsequent taxable period or carryback to any prior taxable period.

A corporation may file a claim for credit or refund of an overpayment of tax resulting from the carryback of a net operating loss under subsection 3 of section 57-38-01.3, or resulting from a federal capital loss carryback, within three years after the prescribed due date for filing the return, including extensions, for the tax year in which the loss was incurred. The provisions of this subsection applicable to net operating losses are ineffective for loss years beginning after December 31, 2002.

A person other than a corporation may file a claim for credit or refund of an overpayment of tax resulting from the carryback of a net operating loss within three years after the prescribed due date for filing the return, including extensions, for the tax year in which the loss was incurred. The provisions of this subsection are effective for loss years beginning after December 31, 1986.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, if any taxpayer, with or without intent to evade any tax imposed by this chapter, fails to file a state income tax return within three years after the due date of the return prescribed in this chapter, no credit or refund of overwithheld income tax or overpaid estimated income tax may be made.

If any person consents to an extension of time for the assessment of state income tax, under subsection 8 of section 57-38-38, the period of time for filing a claim for credit or refund will be similarly extended. Provided, however, if an assessment is issued, the taxpayer has sixty days from the assessment to file a claim for refund. If a claim for refund is filed in any year extended by an agreement under subsection 8 of section 57-38-38, the tax commissioner may assess additional tax for any year extended by the same agreement which has otherwise expired. The additional assessment is limited to issues raised in the claim for refund.

If a person required to file an amended state income tax return, or other information as required by the tax commissioner, under section 57-38-34.4, does so within the ninety-day period prescribed therein, an overpayment of state income tax attributable to the changes or corrections made by the United States internal revenue service, or other competent authority, must be credited or refunded to the person by the tax commissioner, even though other time periods prescribed in this section may have expired; provided the person submits a notice or other pertinent documentation as proof of the final determination of the changes or corrections by the United States internal revenue service, or other competent authority.

If a person required to file an amended state income tax return, or other information as required by the tax commissioner, under section 57-38-34.4, does not do so within the ninety-day period prescribed therein, an overpayment of state income tax attributable to the changes or corrections made by the United States internal revenue service, or other competent authority, must be credited or refunded to the person by the tax commissioner if the person files the amended state income tax return, or other information as required by the tax commissioner, within two years after the final determination of the changes or corrections made by the United States internal revenue service, or other competent authority, even though other time periods prescribed in this section may have expired. This provision does not limit or restrict any other time period prescribed in this section that has not expired as of the end of the two-year period prescribed in this subsection. Any interest otherwise allowed by section 57-38-35.2 does not accrue after the ninety-day period prescribed in section 57-38-34.4, if this subdivision applies.

This subsection applies to any taxable year of an individual, estate, or trust for which changes or corrections have been made by the United States internal revenue service or other competent authority.

If a return is filed by an individual or an individual and spouse and, after the death of the individual, a refund claim is filed or becomes payable, the tax commissioner shall approve the refund for payment to the legal representative of the decedent upon application and presentation of certified copies of letters testamentary or letters of administration establishing the fiduciary relationship of the legal representative.

If the legal representative of the taxpayer has not made application for the refund of the deceased taxpayer within one year from the date of the taxpayer’s death, the tax commissioner may approve the refund to any person within the classifications set out herein and with the following priority: surviving spouse, children, grandchildren, parents, grandparents, and other relatives, upon proper application establishing the relationship of the claimant. Should an application be received from more than one individual in any of the classifications set out herein, the tax commissioner shall honor the earliest postmarked application which is properly filed pursuant to rules adopted by the tax commissioner.

When the tax commissioner acting in good faith has approved a refund payment pursuant to the provisions of this subsection, the tax commissioner shall not be held responsible to any person or legal representative of the decedent who may have qualified to make a proper application but has failed to do so within one year from the date of death of the deceased taxpayer.

Every claim for credit or refund shall be made by filing with the tax commissioner an amended return, or other report as prescribed by the tax commissioner, accompanied by a statement outlining the specific grounds upon which the claim for credit or refund is based.

If the tax commissioner disallows a claim for credit or refund, in part or in full, the tax commissioner shall notify the taxpayer accordingly. The decision of the tax commissioner denying a claim for credit or refund is final and irrevocable thirty days after the date the notice is mailed to the taxpayer unless, within this thirty-day period, the taxpayer has filed a protest with the tax commissioner.

The protest shall set forth the grounds on which the protest is based, along with any other information as may be required by the tax commissioner. If the taxpayer has so requested, the tax commissioner may grant the taxpayer or the authorized representative of the taxpayer an informal conference.

The tax commissioner shall reconsider the denial of the claim for credit or refund after the filing of a protest. The reconsideration may include the further examination by the tax commissioner or the authorized representative of the tax commissioner of a taxpayer’s books, papers, records, or memoranda, including corporate minutes and committee notes.

Within a reasonable period of time after protest, the tax commissioner shall notify the taxpayer of the tax commissioner’s reconsideration of claim for credit or refund. If the decision of the tax commissioner is a denial, the decision is final and irrevocable unless the taxpayer within thirty days following the date of the tax commissioner’s decision seeks formal administrative review of the tax commissioner’s reconsideration of claim for credit or refund by filing a complaint and requesting an administrative hearing. The complaint must be personally served on the tax commissioner or sent by certified mail. The provisions of chapter 28-32 shall apply to and govern the administrative hearing procedure, including appeals from any decision rendered by the tax commissioner. Upon written request of a taxpayer, the tax commissioner may grant a reasonable extension of time for the filing of a complaint.

If the tax commissioner determines that an amount in excess of the correct amount of tax, interest, or penalty due from any person has been paid by or on behalf of that person because of income tax withheld or estimated tax paid, the tax commissioner may approve a refund of the excess amount which shall be paid to that person in the manner provided for payment of other claims against the state, except that it shall not be necessary to first file a claim for refund if the amount to be refunded was paid with respect to a return or report filed by that person with the tax commissioner in the form prescribed therefor.

If the tax commissioner determines there has been an overpayment of tax, any overpaid penalty and interest on that tax must be refunded or credited by the tax commissioner. If interest is paid under section 57-38-35.2, no interest will be paid under this subsection.

A person that would have been entitled to a credit or refund under chapter 57-35.3 for a taxable year beginning before January 1, 2013, may file a claim for refund or credit of an overpayment of tax.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, § 38; 1925 Supp., § 2346a37; S.L. 1929, ch. 240, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 57-3840; S.L. 1961, ch. 359, § 7; 1969, ch. 513, § 1; 1971, ch. 562, § 1; 1983, ch. 639, § 1; 1987, ch. 694, § 4; 1991, ch. 648, § 6; 1993, ch. 557, § 1; 1995, ch. 561, § 2; 1995, ch. 563, § 1; 1995, ch. 564, § 1; 1999, ch. 513, § 2; 2003, ch. 523, § 5; 2009, ch. 545, § 28; 2013, ch. 449, § 15.

Note.

The reference to “subsection 4 of section 57-38-30.3” was originally enacted as “subsection 7 of section 57-38-30.3”. Due to the amendment of section 57-38-30.3 by section 53 of chapter 488, S.L. 2001, section 2 of chapter 522, S.L. 2001, section 1 of chapter 525, S.L. 2001, section 1 of chapter 527, section 1 of chapter 528, S.L. 2001, and section 4 of chapter 524, S.L. 2003, the code revisor had made this change.

57-38-40.1.
Income tax refund reserve.

A reserve for income tax refunds is hereby created as a special fund in the state treasury. The state tax commissioner shall deposit in such fund such amounts from income tax collections as the commissioner deems necessary to pay refunds to which taxpayers may be entitled under the provisions of this chapter and appropriated pursuant to section 12 of article X of the Constitution of North Dakota.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 563, § 1.

57-38-41.
Appeal. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1945, ch. 293, § 1.

57-38-42.
Information at the source. [Effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2021]

Information as to income must be furnished at the source in the manner following:

Except for employers subject to sections 57-38-59 through 57-38-61, every person, a resident of, or having ownership of property with a situs in, or carrying on a trade or business in, this state, including officers and employees of this state or of any political subdivision within this state, making payment of rents, compensation for personal or professional services performed in this state, or other fixed or determinable annual or periodical gains, profits, and income during the calendar year to any taxpayer shall make a complete return thereof to the tax commissioner, in the form and manner prescribed by the tax commissioner. This subsection applies only if an information return for the same item is also required to be filed for federal income tax purposes. Except for those payments from which state income tax was withheld, interest, dividend, pension, and annuity payments are excluded from the reporting requirements of this subsection; provided, if any person has withheld state income tax from an interest, dividend, pension, or annuity payment, that person must be deemed to be an employer for purposes of sections 57-38-59 through 57-38-61 and shall comply with the requirements of those sections. For purposes of this subsection, the tax commissioner is authorized to prescribe rules to specifically exclude items that are otherwise required to be reported under this subsection from the reporting requirements of this subsection if, in the tax commissioner’s judgment, the reporting of the items does not contribute to the effective administration of the state’s income tax laws.

Every partnership carrying on a trade or business in this state shall make a return, stating specifically the items of its gross income and the deductions allowed by this chapter, and shall include in the return the name, address, social security number or federal identification number, whichever applies, and the amount of the distributive share of each partner.

All information returns required under subsection 1 must be made on the basis of a calendar year for payments made during the calendar year and must be filed with the tax commissioner on or before the due date for filing similar returns with the internal revenue service. All partnership returns required under subsection 2 must be made on or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month following the close of the fiscal year of the partnership required to make the return, or if the return is made on the basis of a calendar year, then the return must be made on or before the fifteenth day of April in the year following the calendar year for which such return is made.

Each information return required under subsection 1 must be deemed to be filed with the tax commissioner if the person required to make the return files with the tax commissioner a copy of the information return along with a copy of the transmittal form required to be filed with the internal revenue service. Each partnership return required under subsection 2 must be signed and must contain or be verified by a written declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury.

Each information return required under subsection 1 must be deemed to be filed with the tax commissioner if the person required to make the return has filed an information report on magnetic tape with the United States internal revenue service. All such persons who have received permission from the United States internal revenue service to file on magnetic tape must notify the tax commissioner, by letter, within thirty days of obtaining such permission. This subsection is conditioned on the existence of an agreement between the state of North Dakota and the United States internal revenue service to participate in combined federal-state information reporting.

In case of failure to file an information at the source return as required by subsection 1 by the date prescribed in subsection 3, and after thirty days’ notice to file is given by the tax commissioner, the tax commissioner may assess a penalty of ten dollars for each failure to file, not to exceed two thousand dollars. In case of failure to file a partnership return as required by subsection 2 on the date prescribed in subsection 3, and after thirty days’ notice to file is given by the tax commissioner, the tax commissioner may assess a penalty of five hundred dollars for each failure to file.

Any person required to file an information return under subsection 1, and any passthrough entity with ten or more partners, shareholders, members, or owners shall file the return by electronic data interchange or other electronic media as determined by the tax commissioner. The tax commissioner may waive, upon a showing of good cause, the requirement to file the return or pay the tax due electronically.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, § 23; 1925, ch. 201, § 2; 1925 Supp., § 2346a22; S.L. 1933, ch. 253, § 6; R.C. 1943, § 57-3842; S.L. 1955, ch. 324, §§ 8, 9; 1957 Supp., § 57-3842; S.L. 1959, ch. 397, § 2; 1967, ch. 456, § 1; 1981, ch. 595, § 1; 1983, ch. 640, § 1; 1987, ch. 694, § 5; 1991, ch. 672, § 5; 1991, ch. 674, § 2; 2021, ch. 470, § 1, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2021.

57-38-43.
Interest on delinquent tax. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1969, ch. 514, § 4.

57-38-44.
Tax a personal debt.

Every tax imposed by this chapter, and all increases, interest, and penalties thereon, becomes, from the time it is due and payable, a personal debt from the person or corporation liable to pay the same to this state.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, § 36; 1925 Supp., § 2346a35; R.C. 1943, § 57-3844; S.L. 1955, ch. 327, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 57-3844; S.L. 1961, ch. 362, § 2.

57-38-45.
Interest and penalties.

In addition to other increases to tax and penalty prescribed in this chapter, a taxpayer is subject to interest as follows:

Any taxpayer who requests and is granted an extension of time for filing a return shall pay, with the tax, interest on the tax at the rate of twelve percent per annum from the date the tax would have been due if the extension had not been granted to the date the tax is paid.

If any amount of tax imposed by this chapter, including tax withheld by an employer, is not paid on or before the due date or extended due date for the payment, there must be added to the tax interest at the rate of one percent per month or fraction of a month during which the tax remains unpaid, computed from the due date of the return to the date paid excepting the month in which the return was required to be filed or the tax became due.

If upon audit an additional tax is found to be due, there must be added to the additional tax due interest at the rate of one percent of the additional tax for each month or fraction of a month during which the tax remains unpaid, computed from the due date of the return to the date paid, excepting the month in which the return was required to be filed or the tax became due.

If the mathematical verification of a taxpayer’s return results in additional tax due, there must be added to the additional tax interest at the rate of one percent of the additional tax due for each month or fraction of a month during which the tax remains unpaid, computed from the due date of the return to the date paid, excepting the month in which the return was required to be filed or the tax became due.

If a deficiency is determined for a tax period for which there was an overpayment that was applied to the following tax period’s estimated tax under subsection 6 of section 57-38-62, interest accrues with respect to the amount of the deficiency that is equal to or less than the amount of the overpayment applied from the estimated tax payment date to which the overpayment was applied.

If a deficiency is determined for a tax period for which there was an overpayment of estimated tax that was refunded, interest accrues, with respect to the amount of the deficiency which is equal to or less than the amount of the overpayment of estimated tax refunded, from the date of payment of the refund.

In addition to the tax and interest prescribed in this chapter, a taxpayer is subject to penalties as follows:

If any taxpayer, without intent to evade any tax imposed by this chapter, shall fail to pay the amount shown as tax due on any return, including tax withheld by an employer, filed on or before the due date or extended due date prescribed therefor, there shall be added to the tax a penalty of five percent thereof, or five dollars, whichever is greater.

If any taxpayer, without intent to evade any tax imposed by this chapter, shall fail to file a return, including the employer’s withheld tax return, on or before the due date or extended due date prescribed therefor, there shall be added a penalty equal to five percent of the tax required to be reported, or five dollars, whichever is greater, if the failure is for not more than one month, counting each fraction of a month as an entire month, with an additional five percent for each additional month or fraction thereof during which the failure continues, not exceeding twenty-five percent in the aggregate.

If upon audit of a taxpayer’s return, including tax withheld by an employer, an additional tax is found to be due, there shall be added to the tax the penalty as prescribed in subdivision a or b.

If the mathematical verification of a taxpayer’s return, including tax withheld by an employer, results in additional tax due, there shall be added to the tax the penalty as prescribed in subdivision a or b.

The provisions of subdivision a, b, c, or d do not apply to the extent it has been determined that the taxpayer has offsetting overpayments of income taxes which have not been refunded.

Any person including any officer or employee of any corporation or any member or employee of any partnership or any member, employee, governor, or manager of a limited liability company who, with intent to evade any requirement of this chapter, shall fail to pay any tax, or to make, sign, or verify any return, or to supply any information required by law, or under the provisions of this chapter, or who with like intent shall make, render, sign, or verify any false or fraudulent information, shall be subject to a penalty of not more than one thousand dollars to be recovered by the attorney general, in the name of the state, by action in any court of competent jurisdiction. Such person shall also be guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

In case any person or any corporation fails to pay any tax, addition to tax, interest, or penalty imposed by this chapter, the attorney general shall bring action for the recovery of the amount of the tax, addition to tax, interest, or penalty which may be due, in the name of the state, in any court of competent jurisdiction.

The tax commissioner may for good cause shown waive all or any part of any civil penalty or interest that attached pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

If any taxpayer who has failed to file a return and has been notified by the tax commissioner of the delinquency, refuses or neglects within thirty days after such notice to file a proper return, the tax commissioner shall determine the income of such taxpayer according to the best information available, and shall assess the tax at not more than double the amount so determined. The appropriate interest and penalty prescribed in subsections 1 and 2 shall also be added.

If any corporation fails to file an income tax return as required by section 57-38-32 on the date prescribed in section 57-38-34, and after thirty days’ notice to file is given by the tax commissioner, the tax commissioner may assess a penalty of up to five hundred dollars for each failure to file.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, § 37; 1925 Supp., § 2346a36; R.C. 1943, § 57-3845; S.L. 1967, ch. 457, § 1; 1969, ch. 514, § 3; 1971, ch. 564, § 1; 1975, ch. 106, § 608; 1981, ch. 596, § 1; 1983, ch. 635, § 2; 1985, ch. 630, § 8; 1987, ch. 698, § 1; 1989, ch. 712, § 2; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1993, ch. 92, § 17; 1993, ch. 558, §§ 1, 2; 1997, ch. 493, § 3; 1999, ch. 513, § 3; 2001, ch. 530, § 1.

Cross-References.

Penalty for class A misdemeanor, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

57-38-46.
Certificate of tax commissioner prima facie evidence.

The certificate of the tax commissioner to the effect that a tax has not been paid, or that a return has not been filed, or that information has not been supplied, as required by or under the provisions of this chapter, is prima facie evidence that such tax has not been paid, that such return has not been filed, or that such information has not been supplied.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, § 37, subs. 7; 1925 Supp., § 2346a35, subs. 7; R.C. 1943, § 57-3846.

57-38-47.
Mandamus to compel filing return.

If any taxpayer fails to file a return within sixty days after the time prescribed in this chapter and refuses to file such return within thirty days after having been notified by the tax commissioner to do so, any judge of the district court, upon petition of the tax commissioner, shall issue a writ of mandamus requiring such person to file a return. The order or notice upon the petition shall be returnable not more than ten days after the filing of the petition. The petition must be heard and determined on the return day, or on such day thereafter as the court shall fix, having regard to the speediest possible determination of the case consistent with the rights of the parties. The judgment must include costs in favor of the prevailing party. All writs and process may be issued from the clerk’s office in any county and, except as aforesaid, must be returnable as the court shall order.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, § 37, subs. 3; 1925 Supp., § 2346a36, subs. 3; R.C. 1943, § 57-3847.

57-38-48.
Lien of tax.

Whenever any taxpayer liable to pay a tax or penalty imposed refuses or neglects to pay the same, the amount, including any interest, penalty, or addition to such tax, together with the costs that may accrue in addition thereto, is a lien in favor of the state of North Dakota upon all property and rights to property, whether real or personal, belonging to said taxpayer. Such lien attaches at the time the tax becomes due and payable and continues until the liability for such amount is satisfied.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 241, § 6; R.C. 1943, § 57-3848.

57-38-49.
Preservation of lien.

Any mortgagee, purchaser, judgment creditor, or lien claimant acquiring any interest in, or lien on, any property situated in the state, prior to the commissioner filing in the central indexing system maintained by the secretary of state a notice of the lien provided for in section 57-38-48, takes free of, or has priority over, the lien. The commissioner shall index in the central indexing system the following data:

The name of the taxpayer.

The name “State of North Dakota” as claimant.

The date and time the notice of lien was indexed.

The amount of the lien.

The internal revenue service taxpayer identification number or social security number of the taxpayer.

The notice of lien is effective as of eight a.m. next following the indexing of the notice. Any notice of lien filed by the commissioner may be indexed in the central indexing system without changing its original priority as to property in the county where the lien was filed. The commissioner shall index any notice of lien with no payment of fees or costs to the secretary of state.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 241, § 6; R.C. 1943, § 57-3849; S.L. 1955, ch. 328, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 57-3849; S.L. 1959, ch. 397, § 1; 1965, ch. 417, § 1; 1973, ch. 475, § 1; 1995, ch. 548, § 2; 1997, ch. 478, § 2; 1999, ch. 313, § 6; 2001, ch. 120, § 1; 2011, ch. 456, § 7; 2013, ch. 257, § 38; 2015, ch. 357, § 1.

57-38-50.
Satisfaction of lien.

Upon payment of the tax, together with any accrued penalties and interest, as to which the commissioner has filed a notice of lien, the commissioner shall index a satisfaction of the lien in the central indexing system without fees or costs.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 241, § 6; R.C. 1943, § 57-3850; S.L. 1965, ch. 417, § 2; 1995, ch. 548, § 3; 1997, ch. 478, § 3; 1999, ch. 313, § 7.

57-38-51.
Enforcement of lien.

The attorney general, upon the request of the tax commissioner, shall bring suit without bond, to enforce payment of any taxes and penalties, and to foreclose any lien provided for in this chapter, and, in such action, the attorney general shall have the assistance of the state’s attorney of the county in which the action is brought. The foregoing remedy of the state is cumulative and no action taken by the tax commissioner or attorney general may be construed to be an election on the part of the state or any of its officers to pursue any remedy to the exclusion of any other remedy provided by law for the enforcement or collection of an income tax or penalty or interest.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 241, § 6; R.C. 1943, § 57-3851.

57-38-52.
Field auditors. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 630, § 2.

57-38-53.
Oath and acknowledgment.

The tax commissioner, and such other officers as the tax commissioner may designate, has the power to administer an oath to any person, or to take the acknowledgment of any person, in respect to any return or report required by this chapter, or by the rules and regulations of the tax commissioner.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, § 42; 1925 Supp., § 2346a41; R.C. 1943, § 57-3853.

57-38-54.
Publication of statistics.

The tax commissioner shall prepare and publish biennially statistics reasonably available with respect to the operation of this chapter, including amounts collected, classification of taxpayers, and such other facts as are deemed pertinent and valuable. The commissioner shall publish the tax rate imposed under section 57-38-30.3 as a percentage of adjusted federal tax liability and as the corresponding range of marginal tax rates as if the tax were imposed on taxable income.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, § 43; 1925 Supp., § 2346a42; R.C. 1943, § 57-3854; S.L. 2001, ch. 488, § 54.

57-38-55.
Disposition of revenues.

As soon as practicable, after receipt thereof, the tax commissioner shall turn over to the state treasurer all income taxes collected by the tax commissioner. The state treasurer shall issue a receipt for such collections, which must be made a permanent record in the office of the tax commissioner. Such moneys must be deposited by the state treasurer to the credit of the general fund for the purpose of defraying the general expenses of the state government.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, §§ 40, 46; 1925 Supp., §§ 2346a39, 2346a45; R.C. 1943, § 57-3855.

57-38-56.
Powers of tax commissioner.

The tax commissioner is charged with the administration of this chapter and shall enforce the assessment, levy, and collection of taxes imposed under this chapter. The tax commissioner has power to examine, or cause to be examined by any agent or representative designated by the tax commissioner for that purpose, any books, papers, records, or memoranda bearing upon the matters required to be included in any return or report under this chapter, and may require the attendance of the taxpayer or of any other person having knowledge in the premises, and may take testimony and require proof material for the tax commissioner’s information. The tax commissioner may prescribe all rules, not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, necessary and advisable for its detailed and efficient administration, and may enter into reciprocal agreements with the authorized tax officials of other states to assist in the enforcement of this chapter and to avoid injustice to taxpayers from double taxation.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, §§ 41, 45; 1925 Supp., §§ 2346a40, 2346a44; S.L. 1941, ch. 278, § 2; 1943, ch. 255, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 57-3856.